Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.090

Evaluation system—Technical assistance and support.

The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an evaluation system designed to measure increases in the English and academic proficiency of eligible pupils. When developing the system, the superintendent shall:

(1) Require school districts to assess potentially eligible pupils within ten days of registration using an English proficiency assessment or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district;

(2) Require school districts to annually assess all eligible pupils at the end of the school year using an English proficiency assessment or assessments as specified by the superintendent of public instruction. Results of these assessments shall be made available to both the superintendent of public instruction and the school district;

(3) Develop a system to evaluate increases in the English and academic proficiency of students who are, or were, eligible pupils. This evaluation shall include students when they are in the program and after they exit the program until they finish their K-12 career or transfer from the school district. The purpose of the evaluation system is to inform schools, school districts, parents, and the state of the effectiveness of the transitional bilingual programs in school and school districts in teaching these students English and other content areas, such as mathematics and writing; and

(4) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, provide school districts with technical assistance and support in selecting research-based program models, instructional materials, and professional development for program staff, including disseminating information about best practices and innovative programs. The information must include research about the differences between conversational language proficiency, academic language proficiency, and subject-specific language proficiency and the implications this research has on instructional practices and evaluation of program effectiveness.

[ 2016 c 72 s 401; 2001 1st sp.s. c 6 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.